District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.59

District of Columbia domicile.

(a)

The provisions of § 1-609.06(a) through (h) shall apply to employment in the Executive Service.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1059
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(m), 45 DCR 2464
Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-220, § 2, 46 DCR 481
April 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-84, § 2, 47 DCR 0455
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-185, § 2(c), 49 DCR 6073
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 3(d), 49 DCR 8140
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 19(b), 51 DCR 881
Feb. 6, 2008, D.C. Law 17-108, § 203(f), 54 DCR 10993
This section is referenced in § 1-523.01, § 1-603.01, and § 1-609.06.
1981 Ed., § 1-611.59.
D.C. Law 13-84 added subsec. (c).
D.C. Law 14-185, in the section heading, substituted “District of Columbia domicile” for “District residency”; and rewrote subsec. (a).
D.C. Law 14-213 repealed subsec. (c) which had read as follows: “(c) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section may be waived for Elliott B. Branch, confirmed as Chief Procurement Officer for a 5-year term beginning November 2, 1999.”
D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 17-108 repealed subsec. (b), which had read as follows: “(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section may be waived for an individual appointed as Chief Technology Officer.”
Applicability of § 101(m) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-610.51.